Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Penalties

243.990.
Penalties.

Any person who, by himself or herself or acting through another, directly or indirectly, violates any of the provisions of KRS

243.020

to

243.670

, for which no other penalty is provided, shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; and for the second and each subsequent violation, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties provided for in this subsection shall be in addition to the revocation of the offender’s license.

Any person who, by himself or herself or through another, directly or indirectly, violates subsection (1) of KRS

243.020

shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor; for the second offense, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; and for the third and each subsequent offense, he or she shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

243.020

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person who violates KRS

243.620

with respect to a license issued under KRS

243.050

or

243.082

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

243.720

or

243.730

or any regulation issued thereunder shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

243.710

to

243.850

shall be subject to the uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS

131.180

.

In every case, any tax imposed by KRS

243.710

to

243.720

which is not paid on or before the due date shall bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) from the due date until the date of payment.

Any person who, by himself or herself or acting through another, directly or indirectly, violates KRS 243.502(1) shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor, and for the second and each subsequent violation, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties provided for in this subsection shall be in addition to the suspension or revocation of the offender’s license.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

243.897

shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

2554b-150, 2554b-153, 2554b-195, 2554b-196, 2554b-219, 4214a-21, 4214a-22, 4281c-22, 4281c-27: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 198; 1944, ch. 154, § 24; 1944, ch. 173, § 14; 1960, ch. 186, Art. V, § 3; 1978, ch. 233, § 24, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 452, § 30, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 403, § 24, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 463, § 31, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 28, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2008, ch. 83, § 11, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 121, § 80, effective June 25, 2013.